District of Columbia statutes.
38-2023.03

Effective dates of annuities provided by §§ 38-2023.01 and 38-2023.02; computation.

(a)

An increase in annuity provided by subsection (a), or clause (1) of subsection (b), of § 38-2023.01 shall take effect on August 1, 1958. An increase in annuity provided by clause (2) of such subsection (b) shall take effect on the commencing date of the survivor annuity.

(b)

An annuity provided by § 38-2023.02 shall commence on August 1, 1958, or on the 1st day of the month in which application for such annuity is received by the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agent, or, after October 1, 2004, the 1st day of the month in which application for such annuity is received by the District of Columbia Retirement Board, whichever occurs later.

(c)

The monthly installment of each annuity increased or provided by §§ 38-2023.01 to 38-2023.04 shall be fixed at the nearest dollar.

Sept. 2, 1958, 72 Stat. 1769, Pub. L. 85-917, § 3
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 56, 52 DCR 2638

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1249.
1973 Ed., § 31-743.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (b), inserted “or, after October 1, 2004, the 1st day of the month in which application for such annuity is received by the District of Columbia Retirement Board,” following “agent,”.

Effect of Amendments

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government